src/dictionaries/nl_NL.dic
opsluit/I
voorkeurstem/M
composthoop/P
dooderger/N
decreteer/WP
gemartel/D
failliet/EN
koepelgewelf/Z
klem/WBFMCA
veelzijdig/EH
keuzemenu/X
stoppen/VAU
kropen/GBKC
intelligente/O
verscherp/I
dansrokje/S
getuigd/FK
ombervis/M
druppelt/FCBU
winsten/A
bitteren/V
revue/JS
bicarbonaat/P
gunstig/OEFTRB
cash/N
verdwijn/IN
whiskyfles/M
spraak/CAKFU
wegzet/MW
rekenkundig/E
achterbaks/EH
zandhaas/Z
gehoon/D
autoradio/X
gewaagd/TRH
geslurpt/UKC
bestuurbare/O
nieuwsbulletin/S
vieren/GU
fazantenhaan/P
gaat/FCAKUVB
grappenmakerij/N
spreek/CVAFBU
spikkelde/BG
beukenbos/M
betuttel/NDIW
wrang/HTERN
gewijde/CO
standhouder/F
grauw/HTWRNJE
stoort/V
pronkerig/E
firma/JX
ageer/WP
pluizer/US
uzi/X
gewelddadigheid/Z
plantennaam/P
gezeul/D
sproei/WBN
huislijk/OEH
chromeerde/G
be/T
sluiten/DCUKBAF
superior/S
geeft/VAFCKUB
draai/JFCKUWIGANV
gehuwd/AUO
onbereikbaar/H
scannen/C
puntig/HTRE
gestrooid/U
lesprogramma/X
po/XNTJ
ootmoedig/HTEV
daagt/KVU
aftak/MW
aftel/WM
terroristisch/E
stoven/GFBKAV
voorzien/ONIE
meester/JSN
waarborgkapitaal/P
kalf/ZF
bejegen/NDWI
bepleister/IWD
vracht/BNV
horende/BVG
statelijk/HE
scenario/X
schonen/VK
draait/UFCKAV
geil/RNTEH
ongemakkelijk/TRH
verwerkingsmethode/NS
palmde/C
roep/CAKNUIGBF
onroerendezaakbelasting/N
saxofoon/SPJ
zindelijke/O
kleedt/FBACVU
gallig/EH
plateau/SJ
doceer/PW
geus/Z
kalen/D
toomt/CB
onwrikbaar/H
komsten/ACU
balpen/M
herverzeker/NDWI
heenreed/P
toonzette/G
geregen/CA
dieselauto/X
schroeft/ACFK
pannenkoekmix/N
stellingen/ACFVBK
vrijster/S
dijkt/CBG
palet/MW
geüpload/E
kombuis/Z
vijandig/TRHE
kranig/THE
stoot/VSWPAMUFCK
vindingrijk/RTHE
breekbaar/FOVH
strijken/FCKBVAU
breekbare/FOV
windvaan/P
bramen/F
botsen/DA
tralie/SJ
smeken/DF
ijzel/N
stippelde/GBU
vouw/WCNKJIU
houtduif/Z
vlieg/VAUFCKJBGN
heuvelachtig/RE
inpassingstabel/M
strijder/SB
giro/X
vermink/WIN
onmeedogend/H
houder/BAJKUS
bevattelijke/O
strand/IMWAGN
langde/BV
mottig/EHTR
dwarsboomde/G
cursivering/N
zwaarden/V
prater/SJ
gemetseld/CKF
commanderen/KD
sneeuw/WNBC
vaccinatiebewijs/Z
verhandel/D
kerft/UCV
waar/DWSOHGB
opmerkelijk/SORT
gorig/HE
nut/GMOBW
gezinsdrama/X
bekoel/WID
voorportaal/P
insertie/S
zogen/GUFCKA
voorlaat/TP
gekleurd/TROC
zangcursus/M
scheerbalk/N
verantwoord/OIE
schorst/KG
knabbel/WSGN
perkt/CFB
brommen/U
wafel/JNS
huurhuis/Z
wisselbare/UVC
jumbo/XJ
verschrikkelijk/RHS
voogden/B
gedropen/UF
robuust/EH
inwaai/W
acceptabel/OCRE
bezwanger/IWD
tekening/VNA
radiatie/S
boeken/FCU
helder/TVOKH
kikkert/K
gezette/CUKFA
rekten/UGV
theosoof/P
waarachtig/RTOHE
bars/EH
nableef/Z
lezeres/M
stapel/JIWNKSE
gedachtestreep/JP
trimschema/X
rui/FNWTJKS
toegekend/E
week/VHWCUJF
aanplakking/N
geleerde/OUFA
groette/B
geschenen/FU
gesteun/D
ranzig/ETRH
gestipte/A
verschoonbare/O
bedrijfssituatie/S
roeren/BDAKV
lijfde/NC
IJselijk/TEH
eenheid/Z
vloerde/GB
maskeer/W
ayatollah/XS
Mark/EN
dijkte/B
gestijfd/KA
schreeuwen/DUFB
ven/BNMJGV
ver/BTIGVH
zevental/M
bijtoon/P
verinnerlijk/NI
schenkt/KVBUC
epistel/SJ
verdwaasd/NH
verrassend/SRT
brengen/FACDKU
versaagd/HO
gewilligde/C
bladmotief/Z
klaring/CVNUK
handbediening/N
mond/GEWIMNU
glijden/CVUDF
toegekeerd/E
wies/VNKABF
gehoorzaam/OWDH
wijs/VOZAHUBF
herleef/DZ
gemet/T
smakeloos/H
ochtendprogramma/X
lopende/FVK
koophuis/VZ
zebra/JX
verflauwd/O
wingerd/NS
schieten/FUAKVCB
gediend/AUCKF
vierspan/M
afdwing/I
pardonneerde/G
stekelachtig/EH
contactkantoor/P
gruwel/WN
vreemd/TRVSEHNB
breekt/FUCKAV
vreemde/BV
speelde/UKVBFAGC
partita/X
kijkend/AU
bevredigen/D
grafschrift/N
hoging/NVK
boerenbedrijf/Z
bescheiden/RTOH
boorling/NC
gesjokt/FA
mortier/NJ
losbaar/FK
spouwer/S
genood/OU
opschepperig/EH
trouwen/UGCVSB
overhaast/INE
fruit/WNGM
kak/MNWB
vredelievend/ETRH
stuiverstuk/M
voorgaan/D
meerpaal/P
tijdsschema/X
kocht/VUFCKNABG
aanpunt/I
veiligheidsgevoel/O
roepend/NA
roostering/NC
event/V
bontgekleurd/E
takte/FGV
onderkruipsel/S
hartverscheurend/ET
vrijstelling/N
rasp/WN
dreven/VUGFBKCA
graasde/NFGB
dagende/U
navel/JS
nuttig/SWETIORNH
uitgestrektheid/Z
yogi/X
degelijke/O
baatzuchtig/OHE
haakte/FGCA
bimbam/M
tapvormig/E
verbouw/ID
zeept/GCV
steken/KADVBUFC
getimmerde/FAK
voert/FKCVUA
wimpelt/BF
vals/HEV
hangglider/S
doorstreep/WP
rondboog/P
achtervolg/IWDN
filmstudio/X
scherpte/VOSGAC
ongevaarlijk/R
harkten/A
doodsangst/N
urgent/TER
dood/SG
geschroefde/KFCA
zaag/GFWUV
hoogwaardigheid/Z
karper/JS
kinderbijslagpremie/S
gehobbel/D
bouwtechniek/NK
hoedt/BV
laagstam/M
bezienswaardig/HE
nivelleer/WP
zwakten/V
fortuinlijk/ETRO
stabiele/OC
keuringen/BF
hobo/X
zoetachtig/E
expliciteer/WP
tingel/IWGN
roskamde/G
hoor/GBFAKUVW
riep/CNKAUBF
zeilmaker/S
derft/VB
verzinsel/NJS
houw/BFNCJU
gekrabbelde/K
pinkel/NW
overspoel/WDN
verlichtingstoestel/M
waardeerbare/O
zonderling/TNEH
dronk/UNBVFCK
alibi/X
dij/GNWVU
pulkt/FG
onachtzaamheid/Z
transcendeerde/G
stellig/RTEH
vergrendel/DI
breng/FCKNUA
vorstelijk/EH
dompelen/C
melkbrood/P
sourdine/S
loop/USPJIGBVFCKA
instructieboek/NJ
voortgaan/D
zachte/VO
voorgewend/E
wij/DTWS
leesinrichting/N
kalefateren/K
berkenzwam/M
spitte/GC
slurp/KNWG
eend/VRN
volgden/GV
gebulderd/AU
rafel/IWJNS
strooit/UBV
schitter/NWIG
verkil/D
maai/FWN
maak/UVFWCAK
kistingen/B
krikte/K
odeur/JS
geneigd/HO
staccato/X
sneu/ENRT
gerief/ZDO
vlierboom/P
onkuis/H
ondernemingsplan/M
tjoept/EG
nieuw/SEBJVHKTRN
vreugdedag/N
recessieachtig/E
belemmeren/D
discussiedeelnemer/S
wisseling/VUN
springen/ADUCFKVB
drachten/FK
aangrijp/I
stekend/FUA
lap/JMWKCVF
wasem/WNBSU
opstandig/HTE
irriteer/WP
weglaat/P
rechten/SBAG
herstelbaar/O
luchten/GKBV
gewon/RME
onderstelden/V
tegendruk/M
maaglijder/S
interen/D
baldadigheid/Z
eerzaam/H
kwartierden/C
geschoonde/K
videocamera/X
dopvrucht/N
betast/MI
getart/UE
ordenden/VG
vloeit/FBCUAV
salamander/JS
decent/RCE
laten/VCKFUG
gepoetst/UFK
bloedkoraal/P
ernstig/RTES
pen/NMGCFES
overleef/DZ
drukken/VDUA
geborstelde/KUF
betoog/WD
tegenstrijdigheid/Z
overdachte/O
dommig/H
gemeerd/FA
slachtbank/N
zwemdiploma/X
dierenverzorger/S
standvastig/ORTHE
werkster/SBF
toejuich/IN
kraai/WJUNG
roemrijk/ER
klopte/AKCUGFB
goot/BFPCKUV
hoofdelijk/E
verontrusten/D
melkboerin/M
profeteerde/G
gewinterd/U
wonden/VG
haalt/VAUFCKB
geschampt/F
gematigd/TRAH
buiten/USTJ
woordenrijk/HE
koek/WJNA
gedetailleerd/ORH
binnengalerij/N
gepropt/KC
afdaal/W
kibbel/WSIGN
kolf/Z
gaskroon/P
bepek/MW
zwijgt/V
repro/X
geboord/UA
jakobsladder/S
roofde/NBG
afro/T
veegde/FUGKA
doorgewerkt/E
harpoen/NJ
martelde/FG
keuvel/GNWS
voortvloeien/D
wintertaling/N
overijl/NDWI
venijnigheid/Z
oogstte/C
lakt/GV
bepraat/M
vrolijken/KV
bedlegerig/NHE
elimineer/WP
vergeeflijker/O
interpreteer/PW
prominent/TRNE
heli/X
gebluste/OU
kanteel/J
gemoedelijk/TRHE
kreeg/VFPA
gerichte/UOFCKA
kranste/GB
wijnhandel/S
onderwerp/IN
haaiachtig/E
salarieerde/G
bierkruik/N
beeldde/VCFU
mecenas/M
doorreis/DZ
platenzaak/P
zweef/GZFA
licht/VTMFCKRAIHUBGWNE
mak/MTGEHN
mat/NJTWAGKHCMESVBFU
migreer/PW
scheen/VBPJUF
effen/WINOHV
opmerkzame/O
plundering/UN
gepaalde/F
slaat/AUBVFCK
koopplicht/V
burgwal/M
gebakken/KFCAUO
tegenbezoek/N
taxi/XE
regent/UFBCVN
vrij/EWORKTNGH
doordringend/T
plant/IMCVBGANWUE
secretariaat/P
stiel/JN
bewust/HOE
overdrager/S
verwond/I
oogvlies/Z
